Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-812
Judicial nominating commissions; members; communications; confidential.

All communications between members of judicial nominating commissions and between any member of the commission and any prospective candidate for judicial office and all other communications with members of the commission except those at the public hearing, shall be confidential. Additionally, all such communications including those at the public hearing shall be privileged from use in any legal action, except one charging misconduct in office of a member of a judicial nominating commission or one involving contempt of court, or misconduct of an attorney, based on such communication.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 12, p. 476;

Laws 1980, LB 730, § 4.